Georgia, session 2025_26, SB338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to provide for the restructuring of the City of Macon, the City of Payne City, and
Bibb County, approved April 20, 2012 (Ga. L. 2012, p. 5595), as amended, is amended in
Section 10 by revising subsection (e) as follows:
"(e) The mayor shall be limited to serving a total of no more than three four-year terms.
An initial term of less than four years shall nevertheless be deemed a full term for purposes
of this subsection. Prior service as an officer of the City of Macon or Bibb County shall
not be computed for such limitation."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 338
- 1 -